Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 3 Transportation and Storage of Freight and Livestock

Cross references.

Requirement that hazardous wastes transported across, within, or through state be accompanied by manifest, §

12-8-67

.

Prohibition against payments to labor organizations by carriers or shippers for transportation of motor vehicle, etc., by rail if such vehicle is also capable of being moved or propelled on highways, §

34-6-8

.